Illinois, session 104th, HB1353.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Volunteer Emergency Worker Job Protection 5Act is amended by changing Sections 5, 10, and 20 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 748/5)7    Sec. 5. Volunteer emergency worker; when termination of 8employment prohibited. 9    (a) No public or private employer may terminate or 10penalize an employee who is a volunteer emergency worker 11because the employee, when acting as a volunteer emergency 12worker, is absent from or late to his or her employment in 13order to respond to an emergency prior to the time the employee 14is to report to his or her place of employment or is 15participating in training that the employee is required to 16participate in as a volunteer emergency worker.17    (a-5) A public or private employer shall not discipline an 18employee who is a volunteer emergency worker if the employee, 19in the scope of acting as a volunteer emergency worker, 20responds to an emergency phone call or text message during 21work hours that requests the person's volunteer emergency 22services. This subsection (a-5) does not apply to a person 23employed by a public or private vehicle service provider and   HB1353 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 05894 RTM 15925 b1who is in the course of performing services as Emergency 2Medical Services personnel as defined in Section 3.5 of the 3Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act. This subsection 4(a-5) shall not diminish or supersede an employer's written 5workplace policy, a collective bargaining agreement, 6administrative guidelines, or other applicable written rules 7administered by the employer. Existing written policies 8governing the use of cell phones shall prevail and control.9    (b) An employer may charge, against the employee's regular 10pay, any time that an employee who is a volunteer emergency 11worker loses from employment because of the employee's 12response to an emergency in the course of performing his or her 13duties as a volunteer emergency worker or participation in 14training that the employee is required to participate in as a 15volunteer emergency worker. The employer may not require the 16employee to take vacation time or other compensatory time in 17order to respond to an emergency or participate in training.18    (c) In the case of an employee who is a volunteer emergency 19worker and who loses time from his or her employment in order 20to respond to an emergency in the course of performing his or 21her duties as a volunteer emergency worker or participate in 22training that the employee is required to participate in as a 23volunteer emergency worker, the employer has the right to 24request the employee to provide the employer with a written 25statement from the supervisor or acting supervisor of the 26volunteer fire department or governmental entity that the   HB1353 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 05894 RTM 15925 b1volunteer emergency worker serves stating that the employee 2responded to an emergency and stating the time and date of the 3emergency.4    (d) An employee who is a volunteer emergency worker and 5who may be absent from or late to his or her employment in 6order to respond to an emergency in the course of performing 7his or her duties as a volunteer emergency worker or 8participate in training that the employee is required to 9participate in as a volunteer emergency worker must make a 10reasonable effort to notify his or her employer that he or she 11may be absent or late.12(Source: P.A. 100-324, eff. 1-1-18.) 13    (50 ILCS 748/10)14    Sec. 10. Employer's violation; civil action. An employee 15who is terminated, penalized, or disciplined in violation of 16this Act may bring a civil action against his or her employer 17who violated this Act. The employee may seek reinstatement to 18his or her former position, payment of back wages, 19reinstatement of fringe benefits, and, where seniority rights 20are granted, reinstatement of seniority rights. The employee 21must commence such an action within one year after the date of 22the employer's violation. 23(Source: P.A. 93-1027, eff. 8-25-04.) 24    (50 ILCS 748/20)  HB1353 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 05894 RTM 15925 b1    Sec. 20. Applicability. This Act does not apply to any 2employer that is a municipality with a population of 15,000 37,500 or more.4(Source: P.A. 94-599, eff. 1-1-06; 95-59, eff. 1-1-08.)